Tennessee, session 114, SB1584.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-11-266, is amended by deleting
the section and substituting:
In accordance with the latest recommendations of the advisory committee on
immunization practices of the federal centers for disease control and prevention, unless
contraindicated and subject to the availability of vaccine, a hospital shall:
(1) Offer an inpatient who is fifty (50) years of age or older immunization
against influenza disease each year from October 1 through March 1 prior to
discharging the inpatient; and
(2) Offer an inpatient who is fifty (50) years of age or older immunization
against pneumococcal disease prior to discharging the inpatient.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1584
009863
- 1 -